Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6032YC (2) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 455C.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. âBeverageâ means wine as defined in section 123.3, 3 subsection 53 , alcoholic liquor as defined in section 123.3, 4 subsection 4 , beer as defined in section 123.3, subsection 5 6 , high alcoholic content beer as defined in section 123.3, 6 subsection 22 , canned cocktail as defined in section 123.3, 7 subsection 10 , mineral water, soda water, and similar 8 carbonated soft drinks in liquid form and intended for human 9 consumption. âBeverageâ also means a similar noncarbonated 10 soft drink that is packaged in a metal can, in liquid form, and 11 intended for human consumption. 12